Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 3 Solemnization of Marriages

15-3-1 — 15-3-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, §§ 6, 6*, 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, §§ 6, 6*, 7; P.L. 1909, ch. 430, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, §§ 6, 7; P.L. 1927, ch. 1005, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1956, §§

15-3-1

— 15-3-4; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 363, § 1.

15-3-5.
Officials empowered to join persons in marriage.

Every ordained clergy or elder in good standing; every justice of the supreme court, superior court, family court, workers’ compensation court, district court or traffic tribunal; the clerk of the supreme court; every clerk, administrative clerk, general chief clerk, or administrator of the supreme court, superior court, family court, district court, or traffic tribunal; magistrates, special or general magistrates of the superior court, family court, traffic tribunal or district court; administrative clerks of the district court; administrators of the workers’ compensation court; every former justice or judge and former administrator of these courts; every former chief clerk of the district court; every former clerk, administrative clerk, or general chief clerk of a superior court; the secretary of the senate; elected clerks of the general assembly; any former secretary of the senate; any former elected clerk of the general assembly who retires after July 1, 2007; judges of the United States appointed pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution; bankruptcy judges appointed pursuant to Article I of the United States Constitution; and United States magistrate judges appointed pursuant to federal law, may join persons in marriage in any city or town in this state; and every justice and every former justice of the municipal courts of the cities and towns in this state and of the police court of the town of Johnston and the administrator of the Johnston municipal court, while he or she is serving as an administrator, and every probate judge and every former probate judge may join persons in marriage in any city or town in this state, and wardens of the town of New Shoreham may join persons in marriage in New Shoreham. In addition to the foregoing, the governor shall designate, upon application, any person eighteen (18) years or older to solemnize a particular marriage on a particular date and in a particular city or town, and may for cause at any time revoke such designation. In the case of persons so designated by the governor, the secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement and carry out the provisions of this section. The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of designation upon payment of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for applications delivered by mail, facsimile, or hand. All applications submitted electronically shall pay a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00). Upon payment, a certificate of designation shall be issued within twenty-one (21) days. The certificate shall expire upon completion of the solemnization. The fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the general fund.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 8; C.P.A. 1905, § 1228; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 8; P.L. 1922, ch. 2207, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 8; P.L. 1932, ch. 1896, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2042, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 8; P.L. 1949, ch. 2290, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-5

; P.L. 1974, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 363, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 489, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 561, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 607, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 132, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 205, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 42; P.L. 2004, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 484, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 512, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 84, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 85, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 86, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 87, § 1, effective June 25, 2021.

15-3-6.
Marriages after the manner of Friends, according to Jewish rites, or spiritual assembly of Baha’is.

Any marriage which may be had and solemnized among the people called Quakers, or Friends, in the manner and form used or practiced in their societies, or among persons professing the Jewish religion, according to their rites and ceremonies, or by a local spiritual assembly of the Baha’is according to the usage of the religious community, shall be good and valid in law; and wherever the words “minister” and “elder” are used in this chapter, they shall be held to include all of the persons connected with the Society of Friends, or Quakers, and with the Jewish religion, and with the Baha’i faith, who perform or have charge of the marriage ceremony according to their rites and ceremonies.

History of Section.

G. L. 1896, ch. 191, § 9; G. L. 1909, ch. 243, § 9; G. L. 1923, ch. 287, § 9; G. L. 1938, ch. 415, § 9; G. L. 1956, §

15-3-6

; P. L. 1970, ch. 72, § 1.

15-3-6.1.
Protection of freedom of religion in marriage.

Consistent with the guarantees of freedom of religion set forth by both the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Article I, Section 3 of the Rhode Island Constitution, each religious institution has exclusive control over its own religious doctrine, policy, and teachings regarding who may marry within its faith, and on what terms, as long as such policies are consistent with §§

15-1-2

,

15-1-3

,

15-1-4

, and

15-1-5

. No court or other state or local governmental body, entity, agency, or commission shall compel, prevent, or interfere in any way with any religious institution’s decisions about marriage eligibility within that particular faith’s tradition.

Consistent with the guarantees of freedom of religion set forth by both the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Article I, Section 3 of the Rhode Island Constitution, no regularly licensed or ordained clergyperson, minister, elder, priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any church or religious denomination as described and authorized in §§

15-3-5

and

15-3-6

to officiate at a civil marriage, is required to solemnize any marriage. A regularly licensed or ordained clergyperson, minister, elder, priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any church or religious denomination shall be immune from any civil claim or cause of action based on a refusal to solemnize any marriage under this chapter. No state agency or local government may base a decision to penalize, withhold benefits from, or refuse to contract with any church or religious denomination on the refusal of a person associated with such church or religious denomination to solemnize a marriage under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a religions organization, association, or society, and any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by a religious organization, association, or society, or a fraternal benefit or service organization that has among its stated purposes the promotion and support or protection of a religious organization, association, or society and that restricts membership to practicing members of that religious organization, association, or society, shall not be required to provide services, accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, or privileges to an individual if the request for such services, accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, or privileges is related to:

The solemnization of a marriage or the celebration of a marriage, and such solemnization or celebration is in violation of its religious beliefs and faith; or

The promotion of marriage through any social or religious programs or services, that violates the religious doctrine or teachings of religious organization, association, or society. Any refusal by an entity described above or an officer, employee, or member thereof acting in an official capacity on behalf of that entity to provide services, accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, or privileges in accordance with this subsection shall not create any civil claim or cause of action. This subsection shall not be construed to limit a religious organization, association, or society, or a fraternal benefit or service organization as described in this subsection, from selectively providing services, accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, or privileges to some individuals with respect to solemnization or celebration of a marriage but not to others.

Nothing in the marriage laws of this state shall be deemed or construed to limit the protections and exemptions provided to religious organizations under §§

28-5-6(8)(ii)

and

34-37-4.2(a)

.

A fraternal benefit or service organization that is operated, supervised, or controlled by a religious organization and a fraternal benefit or service organization that has among its stated purposes the promotion, support, or protection of a religious organization and that restricts its membership to practicing members of that religious organization shall not be required to admit any individual as a member or to provide benefits to any individual. A refusal by a fraternal benefit or service organization by a member, officer, or employee thereof acting in an official capacity on behalf of a society described herein, to admit an individual as a member or to provide benefits related to a marriage that is in violation of the religious doctrine or teachings of the religious organization to which its members are required to adhere, shall not create a civil claim or result in any government action to penalize; withhold benefits from the fraternal benefit or service organization; or discriminate against a society, or a member, officer, or employee described herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 49.

15-3-7.
Presentation of marriage license.

No minister, elder, justice, warden, or other person shall join any person in marriage until the persons to be married have presented to him or her the license named in chapter 2 of this title, and he or she has signed the certificate appended to the license.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 12; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-7

.

15-3-8.
Witnesses to ceremony.

The solemnization of marriage shall be in the presence of at least two (2) witnesses besides the minister, elder, justice, or warden officiating.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 17; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-8

.

15-3-9.
Statement of objections to marriage.

If any person has any lawful objection to the marriage of any two (2) persons, he or she may state the objection in writing, under his or her hand, to the minister, elder, justice, or warden about to solemnize the marriage, at which time the minister, elder, justice, or warden shall proceed no further in the marriage until the lawful objection has been removed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 18; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-9

.

15-3-10.
Penalty for marriage without license or despite impediment.

Every minister, elder, justice, warden, or other person who joins persons in marriage, without first receiving the license required by chapter 2 of this title, containing the required information, or whenever the solemnization of the marriage has been lawfully objected to and the impediment is not removed, shall be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 19; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-10

.

15-3-11.
Knowingly performing bigamous marriage.

Every person authorized by law to join persons in marriage, who joins in marriage any woman or man that he or she knows to have a husband or wife living, shall be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 21; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-11

.

15-3-12.
Endorsement and return of license.

Every minister, elder, justice, warden, or other person who joins any persons in marriage, shall:

Endorse the “License and Certificate of Marriage” form, prescribed pursuant to §

15-2-7

, presented to him or her by the persons, as provided in §

15-3-7

, and certify that the persons have been joined in marriage by him or her in accordance with the laws of the state of Rhode Island; and

Complete all the information on the “License and Certificate of Marriage” and file the form within seventy-two (72) hours following the date of the marriage with the clerk in the town or city from which the license was issued.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 13; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 13; P.L. 1927, ch. 1064, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-12

; P.L. 1961, ch. 100, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 200, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 258, § 4.

15-3-13.
Filing of return of marriage.

The town or city clerk to whom the return of marriage provided for in §

15-3-12

is sent shall carefully file and preserve the return.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 16; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-13

.

15-3-14.
Neglect of duty by person performing ceremony.

Every minister, elder, justice, warden, or other person authorized to join persons in marriage, including those authorized to join in marriage according to the Jewish religion, who fails to perform any of the duties devolved upon him or her by this chapter, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) with the exception of the penalties for the violations contained in §§

15-3-10

,

15-3-11

,

15-3-15

and

15-3-16

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 20; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-14

; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 42.

15-3-15.
Marriages valid despite irregularities — Penalty for marriage without compliance.

No marriage solemnized before a person professing to have a license to join persons in marriage as required by this chapter, or professing to be a justice of the supreme, superior, or family court, or a warden of the town of New Shoreham, or solemnized in the Society of Friends, or among persons professing the Jewish religion or Baha’i faith according to their respective rites and ceremonies, shall be deemed or adjudged to be void, nor shall the validity of the marriage be in any way affected by want of jurisdiction or authority in the person or Society nor by reason of noncompliance with any of the requirements of this chapter, if the marriage is in other respects lawful and has been performed with a full belief on the part of the persons so married, or either of them, that they have been lawfully joined in marriage.

But whoever gives, or procures to be given, any false information as to the requirements under §§

15-2-1

—

15-2-10

, or whoever is married without duly proceeding as is required by chapters 1 — 3 of this title, shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 22; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1228; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-15

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 64.

15-3-16.
Solemnization of marriage without authority.

Every person who solemnizes a marriage without being legally authorized to do so shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 191, § 23; P.L. 1898, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 243, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 287, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 415, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

15-3-16

.

15-3-17.
Court orders regarding invalid marriages.

If, as the result of a court decision pursuant to chapter 6 of title 11, chapters 1 — 3 of this title, or chapter 3 of title 23, any marriage which has occurred in Rhode Island is declared invalid, the court shall order the state registrar of vital records to mark “invalid” the original marriage record on file at the division of vital records and to note the invalidity of the marriage on all other files or references to the marriage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 198, § 1.